Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-280
Foreign limited partnership; law governing.

Subject to the Constitution of Nebraska, (1) the laws of the state or foreign country under which a foreign limited partnership is organized govern its organization and internal affairs and the liability of its limited partners and (2) a foreign limited partnership may not be denied registration by reason of any difference between those laws and the laws of this state.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 48;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 51.